California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(c) Except as may be otherwise provided in the proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of any revenue bonds, bonds secured by a pledge of revenues, or bonds for improvement districts secured by a pledge of revenues, revenues of any kind or nature derived from any revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, or property owned, operated, or controlled by the consolidated agency shall be pledged, charged, assigned, and have a lien thereon for the payment of the bonds as long as they are outstanding, regardless of any changes in ownership, operation, or control of the revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities or property and it shall, in any later event or events, be the duty of the successors or assigns to continue to maintain and operate the revenue-producing improvements, works, facilities, and property as long as bonds are outstanding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132372.

(a) The consolidated agency may purchase transit equipment such as cars, trolley buses, motorbuses, light rail vehicles, or rolling equipment, and may execute agreements, leases, and equipment trust certificates in the forms customarily used by private corporations engaged in the transit business appropriate to effect the purchase and leasing of transit equipment, and may dispose of the equipment trust certificates upon the terms and conditions that the consolidated agency may deem appropriate.

(b) Payment for transit equipment, or rentals therefor, may be made in installments, and the deferred installments may be evidenced by equipment trust certificates that are or will be legally available to the consolidated agency. Title to the equipment shall not vest in the consolidated agency until the equipment trust certificates are paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132372.1.

The agreement to purchase or lease transit equipment may direct the vendor or lessor to sell and assign or lease the transit equipment to a bank or trust company duly authorized to transact business in the state as trustee for the benefit and security of the equipment trust certificates, and may direct the trustee to deliver the transit equipment to one or more designated officers of the consolidated agency and may authorize the consolidated agency to simultaneously therewith execute and deliver an installment purchase agreement or a lease of such equipment to the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132372.2.

(a) The agreements and leases shall be duly acknowledged before a person authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds and in the form required for acknowledgment of deeds.

(b) The agreements, leases and equipment trust certificates shall be authorized by resolution of the consolidated agency and shall contain covenants, conditions, and provisions which may be deemed necessary or appropriate to ensure the payment of the equipment trust certificates from such legally available source or sources of funds as may be specified in the certificates.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132372.3.

The covenants, conditions, and provisions of the agreements, leases and equipment trust certificates shall not conflict with any of the provisions of any trust agreement or similar document securing the payment of bonds, notes, or certificates of the consolidated agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

132372.4.

(a) An executed copy of each agreement and lease shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State, who shall be entitled to receive one dollar ($1) for each copy filed.

(b) The filing constitutes notice to any subsequent judgment creditor or any subsequent purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 743, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Pasadena Metro Blue Line Construction Authority [132400. - 132450.]

132400.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) The “authority” is the Metro Gold Line Foothill Extension Construction Authority created under this chapter, formerly known as the Pasadena Metro Blue Line Construction Authority.

(b) The “board” is the governing board of the authority.

(c) The “commission” is the California Transportation Commission.

(d) The “LACMTA” is the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(e) The “project” is the
 Los Angeles-Pasadena Foothill Extension Gold Line light rail project, formerly known as the Los Angeles-Pasadena Metro Blue Line, extending from Union Station in the City of Los Angeles to Sierra Madre Villa Boulevard in the City of Pasadena and any mass transit guideway that may be planned east of Sierra Madre Villa Boulevard along the rail right-of-way extending to the City of Montclair.

(f) The “extension cities” are the Cities of Arcadia, Monrovia, Duarte, Irwindale, Azusa, Glendora, San Dimas, La Verne, Pomona, Claremont, and Montclair.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 189, Sec. 1.   (AB 1600)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

132405.

The authority is hereby created for the purpose of awarding and overseeing all design and construction contracts for completion of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

132410.

(a) The authority has all of the powers necessary for planning, acquiring, leasing, developing, jointly developing, owning, controlling, using, jointly using, disposing of, designing, procuring, and building the project, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Acceptance of grants, fees, allocations, and transfers of funds from federal, state, and local agencies, as well as private entities.

(2) Acquiring, through purchase or through eminent domain proceedings, any property necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for, the exercise of the powers of the authority.

(3) Incurring indebtedness, secured by pledges of revenue available for project completion.

(4) Contracting with public and private entities for the planning, design, and construction of the project. These contracts may be assigned separately or may be combined to include any or all tasks necessary for completion of the project.

(5) Entering into cooperative or joint development agreements with local governments or private entities. These agreements may be entered into for the purpose of sharing costs, selling or leasing land, air, or development rights, providing for the transferring of passengers, making pooling arrangements, or for any other purpose that is necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted the authority. For purposes of this paragraph, “joint development”
 includes, but is not limited to, an agreement with any person, firm, corporation, association, or organization for the operation of facilities or development of projects adjacent to, or physically or functionally related to, the project.

(6) Relocation of utilities, as necessary for completion of the project.

(b) The duties of the authority include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Conducting the financial studies and the planning and engineering necessary for completion of the project.

(2) (A) Adoption of an administrative code, not later than 60 days after establishment of the authority, for administration of the authority in accordance with any applicable laws, including, but not limited to, the Ralph M. Brown
 Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the provisions of this chapter, laws generally applicable to local agency procurements and contracts, laws relating to contracting goals for minority and women business participation, and the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(B) (i) The administrative code adopted under subparagraph (A) shall include a code of conduct for employees and board members that is consistent with Sections 84308 and 87103 of the Government Code and prohibits board members and staff from accepting gifts valued at ten dollars ($10) or more from contractors, potential contractors, or their subcontractors.

(ii) The code shall require the disclosure, on the record, of the proceedings by the officer of the agency who
 receives a contribution within the preceding 24 months in an amount of more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) from a party or participant to a proceeding, and the disclosure by the party or participant.

(iii) The code shall provide that no officer of the agency shall make, participate in making, or in any way attempt to use his or her official position to influence the decision in a proceeding, as described in Section 84308 of the Government Code, if the officer has willfully or knowingly received a contribution in the amount of more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) within the preceding 24 months from a party or his or her agent, or from any participant or his or her agent if the participant has a financial interest in the decision.

(iv) Any officer deemed ineligible to participate in a proceeding due to the provisions of this code of conduct may be replaced for the
 purposes of that proceeding by an appointee chosen by the appropriate appointing authority.

(v) Under the code of conduct, board members shall be deemed to have a financial interest in a decision within the meaning of Section 87100 of the Government Code if the decision involves the donor of, or intermediary or agent for a donor of, a gift or gifts aggregating ten dollars ($10) or more in value within the 12 months prior to the time the decision was made.

(vi) Board members and alternate members shall not be considered financially interested, under or for the purposes of Section 1090 of the Government Code, solely by virtue of their holding office with the authority and, concurrently, holding office with an entity set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 132415, an extension city, or both such an entity and such a city, and they may participate in decisions and agreements regarding
 the authority, any of the entities set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 132415, and any of the extension cities. The participation described in this clause shall not constitute a conflict of interest under or for the purposes of Section 1090 of the Government Code, or an incompatible employment, activity, or enterprise under or for the purposes of Section 1126 of the Government Code.

(c) The authority shall make reasonable progress, as determined by the commission, in the design and construction of the project within the timetable imposed under the 1998 State Transportation Improvement Program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 189, Sec. 2.   (AB 1600)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

132415.

(a) The authority shall be governed by a board consisting of five voting members and four nonvoting members who shall be appointed as follows:

(1) Three members shall be appointed by the City Councils of the Cities of Los Angeles, Pasadena, and South Pasadena, with each city council appointing one member by a majority vote of the membership of that city council.

(2) One member shall be appointed by the President of the Governing Board of the San Gabriel Valley Council of Governments, subject to confirmation by that board.

(3) One member shall be appointed by the LACMTA.

(4) One nonvoting member shall be appointed by the Governor.

(5) Two nonvoting members shall be appointed by the City Councils of the Cities of Pasadena and South Pasadena, with each city appointing one nonvoting member.

(6) One nonvoting member shall be appointed by the president of the board of directors of the San Bernardino Associated Governments, subject to confirmation by that board.

(b) All members shall serve a term of not more than four years, with no limit on the number of terms that may be served by any person.

(c) Each appointing authority shall also appoint an alternate member to serve in a member’s absence. If the position of a voting member becomes vacant, the alternate member
 shall serve until the position is filled as required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Members of the board are subject to the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(e) Three members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

(f) The board shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson from among the membership of the board.

(g) Each member of the board may be compensated at a rate of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per day spent attending to the business of the authority. Compensation, if paid, shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per month, plus expenses directly related to the performance of duties imposed by the authority, including, but not limited to, travel and personal
 expenses.

(h) Members appointed to the board may include members of the entities set forth in subdivision (a), and members of the city councils or other elected officials of the extension cities, or both. The simultaneous membership described in this subdivision shall not constitute a violation of Section 1099 or 1126 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 189, Sec. 3.   (AB 1600)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

132420.

(a) The board may appoint an executive director to serve at the pleasure of the authority.

(b) The executive director is exempt from all civil service provisions and shall be paid a salary established by the board.

(c) The executive director may appoint staff or retain consultants as necessary to carry out the duties of the authority.

(d) All contracts approved and awarded by the executive director shall be awarded in accordance with state laws generally applicable to local agency procurements and contracts, subject to the provisions of this chapter.
 Awards shall be based on price or competitive negotiation, or on both of those things.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 189, Sec. 4.   (AB 1600)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

132425.

The LACMTA shall identify and expeditiously enter into an agreement with the authority to hold in trust with the authority all real and personal property, and any other assets accumulated in the planning, design, and construction of the project, including, but not limited to, rights-of-way, documents, third-party agreements, contracts, and design documents, as necessary for completion of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

132430.

(a) The LACMTA shall transfer the unencumbered balance of all local funds programmed for completion of the project and that have been identified in the Restructuring Plan adopted by the LACMTA Board of Directors on May 13, 1998, to the authority for completion of the project.

(b) The authority is eligible to receive allocations of state funds for the project. The unencumbered balance of funds currently programmed or allocated to the LACMTA for completion of the project and that have been identified in the Restructuring Plan adopted by the LACMTA Board of Directors on May 13, 1998, shall be allocated to the authority for completion of the project.

(c) Any transfer of funds by the LACMTA under this section shall be subject to the terms of the memorandum of understanding entered into between the LACMTA and the commission on June 2, 1998.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

132435.

The authority shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the LACMTA that shall specifically address the ability of the LACMTA to review any significant changes in the scope of the design or construction, or both design and construction, of the project. For purposes of this section, the term “significant change” means any change of mode or technology, or any other substantive change that affects the connectivity and operation of the project as part of the overall transit system operated by the LACMTA, or any combination of those things. Design and construction of a light rail project that is consistent with the current scope of the project shall not be deemed to be a significant change in the scope of the project and shall not require concurrence by the LACMTA.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

132440.

The authority shall not encumber any future farebox revenue anticipated from the operation of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

132445.

The authority shall not encumber the project with any obligation that is transferable to the LACMTA upon completion of the design and construction of the project. The design and construction to be administered by the authority does not include rolling stock, which is a component of the operation of the project and shall be administered by the LACMTA. This section does not apply to any joint development programs, as authorized under paragraph (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 132410, that may be utilized to contribute to the financing of project design and construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 1021, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

132450.

(a) (1) The LACMTA shall assume responsibility for operating all completed phases of the project.

(2) Subject to subparagraph (A), the LACMTA shall have the authority to operate the portion of the project located in the County of San Bernardino, which extends approximately one-half mile from the Los Angeles and San Bernardino County line to the Montclair Transit Center. 

(A) With respect to the portion of the project on the right-of-way owned by the San Bernardino Associated Governments, the LACMTA’s authority to operate the project shall be contingent upon the approval of the board of directors
 of the San Bernardino Associated Governments, acting as the county transportation commission, through approval of an operations and maintenance agreement with the LACMTA.

(B) The operations and maintenance agreement shall provide that the San Bernardino Associated Governments reimburse the LACMTA for the costs of operating that portion of the line located in the County of San Bernardino.

(C) Prior to the commencement of construction of the portion of the project in the County of San Bernardino, the authority shall enter into a construction agreement with the San Bernardino Associated Governments, acting as the county transportation commission.

(3) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the LACMTA to allocate funds to the project beyond funds that have been allocated as of January 1, 2012.

(b) The authority shall be dissolved when project construction has been completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 189, Sec. 5.   (AB 1600)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Exposition Metro Line Construction Authority [132600. - 132650.]

132600.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) The “authority” is the Exposition Metro Line Construction Authority created under this chapter.

(b) The “board” is the governing board of the authority.

(c) The “commission” is the California Transportation Commission.

(d) The “LACMTA” is the Los Angeles County Metropolitan Transportation Authority.

(e) The “project” is the Los Angeles-Exposition Metro Line light rail project extending from the Metro Rail Station at 7th Street and Flower Street in the City of Los Angeles to the downtown of the City of Santa Monica.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132605.

The authority is hereby created for the purpose of awarding and overseeing final design and construction contracts for completion of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132610.

(a) The authority has all of the powers necessary for planning, acquiring, leasing, developing, jointly developing, owning, controlling, using, jointly using, disposing of, designing, procuring, and building the project, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Acceptance of grants, fees, allocations, and transfers of funds from federal, state, and local agencies, and private entities.

(2) Acquiring, through purchase or through eminent domain proceedings, any property necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for, the exercise of the powers of the authority, provided the authority shall use existing rights-of-way where feasible.

(3) Incurring indebtedness, secured by pledges of revenue available for project completion.

(4) Contracting with public and private entities for the planning, design, and construction of the project. These contracts may be assigned separately or may be combined to include any or all tasks necessary for completion of the project.

(5) Entering into cooperative or joint development agreements with local governments or private entities. These agreements may be entered into for the purpose of sharing costs, selling or leasing land, air, or development rights, providing for the transferring of passengers, making pooling arrangements, or for any other purpose that is necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted to the authority. For purposes of this paragraph, “joint development” includes, but is not limited to, an agreement with any person, firm, corporation, association, or organization for the operation of facilities or development of projects adjacent to, or physically or functionally related to, the project.

(6) Relocation of utilities, as necessary for completion of the project.

(b) The duties of the authority include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Conducting financial and environmental studies, planning, and engineering necessary for completion of the project.

(2) (A) Adoption of an administrative code for administration of the authority in accordance with any applicable laws, including, but not limited to, the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), contracting and procurement laws, laws relating to contracting goals for minority and women business participation, and the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(B) (i) The administrative code adopted under subparagraph (A) shall include a code of conduct for employees and board members that is consistent with Sections 84308 and 87103 of the Government Code and prohibits board members and staff from accepting gifts valued at ten dollars ($10) or more from contractors, potential contractors, or their subcontractors.

(ii) The code shall require the disclosure, on the record, of the proceedings by the officer of the agency who receives a contribution within the preceding 24 months in an amount of more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) from a party or participant to a proceeding, and the disclosure by the party or participant.

(iii) The code shall provide that no officer of the agency shall make, participate in making, or in any way attempt to use his or her official position to influence the decision in a proceeding, as described in Section 84308 of the Government Code, if the officer has willfully or knowingly received a contribution in the amount of more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) within the preceding 24 months from a party or his or her agent, or from any participant or his or her agent, if the participant has a financial interest in the decision.

(iv) Any officer deemed ineligible to participate in a proceeding due to the provisions of this code of conduct may be replaced for the purposes of that proceeding by an appointee chosen by the appropriate appointing authority.

(v) Under the code of conduct, board members shall be deemed to have a financial interest in a decision within the meaning of Section 87100 of the Government Code if the decision involves the donor of, or intermediary or agent for a donor of, a gift or gifts aggregating ten dollars ($10) or more in value within the 12 months prior to the time the decision was made.

(vi) Board members, alternate members, officers, consultants, and employees shall not be considered financially interested solely by virtue of their holding office or being employed by the authority as well as an appointing authority set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 132615, and they may participate in decisions and agreements regarding the authority and any of the appointing authorities set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 132615. The participation described in this clause shall not constitute a conflict of interest under Section 1090 of the Government Code and shall not constitute an incompatible activity under Section 1126 of the Government Code.

(3) As necessary for final design and construction, completion of a detailed management, implementation, safety, and financial plan for the project and submission of the plan to the Governor, the Legislature, and the commission.

(c) The authority shall make reasonable progress, as determined by the commission, in the final design and construction of the project.

(d) The duties and responsibilities imposed by this section shall be contingent upon allocation of federal and local funds by the LACMTA for these purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 130, Sec. 224.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

132615.

(a) The authority shall be governed by a board consisting of seven voting members who shall be appointed as follows:

(1) Two members shall be appointed by the City Councils of the Cities of Santa Monica and Culver City with each city council appointing one member by a majority vote of the membership of that city council.

(2) Two members shall be appointed by the Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors.

(3) One member shall be appointed by the LACMTA.

(4) Two members shall be appointed by the City Council of the City of Los Angeles by a majority vote of its membership.

(b) All members shall serve a term of not more than four years, with no limit on the number of terms that may be served by any person.

(c) Each appointing authority shall also appoint an alternate member to serve in a member’s absence. If the position of a voting member becomes vacant, the alternate member shall serve until the position is filled as required pursuant to subdivision (a).

(d) Members of the board are subject to the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code).

(e) Four members of the board shall constitute a quorum.

(f) The board shall elect a chairperson and vice chairperson from among the membership of the board.

(g) Each member of the board may be compensated at a rate of not more than one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per day spent attending to the business of the authority. Compensation, if paid, shall not exceed six hundred dollars ($600) per month, plus expenses directly related to the performance of duties imposed by the authority, including, but not limited to, travel and personal expenses.

(h) The Chief Executive Officer of the LACMTA shall serve on the board as an ex officio, nonvoting member.

(i) Members appointed to the board may include members or employees of the appointing authorities set forth in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 808, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

132620.

(a) The board may appoint an executive director to serve at the pleasure of the authority.

(b) The executive director is exempt from all civil service provisions and shall be paid a salary established by the board.

(c) The executive director may appoint staff or retain consultants as necessary to carry out the duties of the authority.

(d) All contracts approved and awarded by the executive director shall be awarded in accordance with state and federal laws relating to procurement. Awards shall be based on price or competitive negotiation, or on both of those things.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132625.

The LACMTA shall identify and expeditiously enter into an agreement or agreements with the authority to do all of the following:

(a) Hold in trust with the authority all real and personal property, and any other assets accumulated in the planning, design, and construction of the project, including, but not limited to, rights-of-way, documents, third-party agreements, contracts, and design documents, as necessary for completion of the project, unless otherwise agreed upon by the LACMTA and the authority.

(b) Outline the design review, construction, and testing process that acknowledges LACMTA’s direct role in the review of the project to ensure the final project will be compatible, functionally connected, and operative within LACMTA’s existing metro rail system.

(c) Describe the various funding sources and the obligations of the authority to assist LACMTA obtain federal, state, and local funds for the project, and the authority’s obligations and duties upon receipt of the funds necessary to construct the project.

(d) Describe all financial elements of the project, and the budget approved for the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 808, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

132635.

The authority shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the LACMTA that shall specifically address the ability of the LACMTA to review any significant changes in the scope of the design or construction, or both design and construction, of the project. For purposes of this section, the term “significant change” means any change of mode or technology, or any other substantive change that affects the connectivity and operation of the project as part of the overall transit system operated by the LACMTA, or any combination of those things. Design and construction of a light rail project that is consistent with the current scope of the project shall not be deemed to be a significant change in the scope of the project and shall not require concurrence by the LACMTA.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132640.

The authority shall not encumber any future farebox revenue anticipated from the operation of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 827, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

132645.

The authority shall not encumber the project with any obligation that is transferable to the LACMTA upon completion of the design and construction of the project. The design and construction to be administered by the authority does not include rolling stock and fare collection equipment, which is a component of the operation of the project and shall be provided and administered by the LACMTA.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 808, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

132650.

The authority shall be dissolved upon completion of construction of the light rail project. The LACMTA shall assume responsibility for operating the project upon completion of the project or any of its phases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 808, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8.  Tri-Valley-San Joaquin Valley Regional Rail Authority [132651. - 132661.]

132651.

As used in this chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Authority” means the Tri-Valley-San Joaquin Valley Regional Rail Authority created under this chapter.

(b) “Bay Area Rapid Transit” (BART) means the Bay Area Rapid Transit
 District.

(c) “Board” means the governing board of the authority.

(d) “Connectivity” means one or more projects necessary to achieve transit connectivity between BART’s rapid transit system and the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission’s Altamont Corridor Express commuter rail service, and to provide quality, seamless service to riders using the services operating between the Tri-Valley and the
 San Joaquin Valley.

(e) “Tri-Valley” means the Cities of Danville, Dublin, Livermore, Pleasanton, and San Ramon.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   (AB 758)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132652.

(a) The authority is hereby established for purposes of planning, developing, delivering, and operating cost-effective and responsive transit connectivity, between BART’s rapid transit system and the Altamont Corridor Express commuter rail service, that reflects regional consensus and meets the goals and objectives of the San Joaquin Valley and Tri-Valley communities, consistent with the project feasibility report adopted pursuant to Section 132661.

(b) The authority shall be considered a rail transit district for the purposes set forth in Article 5 (commencing with Section 53090) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   (SB 548)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

132655.

The governing board of the authority shall be composed of one representative from each of the following entities to be appointed by the governing board, mayor, or supervisor of each entity:

(a) The Bay Area Rapid Transit District.

(b) The City of Dublin.

(c) The City of Lathrop.

(d) The City of Livermore.

(e) The City of Manteca.

(f) The City of Pleasanton.

(g) The City of Stockton.

(h) The City of Tracy.

(i) The County of Alameda.

(j) The County of San Joaquin.

(k) The Livermore Amador Valley Transit Authority.

(l) The
 City of Mountain House.

(m) The San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission.

(n) The City of Danville.

(o) The City of San Ramon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 417, Sec. 1.   (SB 506)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

132656.

The authority has all of the powers necessary for planning, acquiring, leasing, developing, jointly developing, owning, controlling, using, jointly using, disposing of, designing, procuring, and constructing facilities to achieve transit connectivity, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Acceptance of grants, fees, allocations, and transfers of moneys from federal, state, and local agencies, including, but not limited to, moneys from local measures, as well as private entities.

(b) Acquiring, through purchase or through eminent domain proceedings, any property necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for, the exercise of the
 powers of the authority.

(c) Incurring indebtedness, secured by pledges of available revenue.

(d) (1) Contracting with public and private entities for the planning, design, and construction of the connection. These contracts may be assigned separately or may be combined to include any or all tasks necessary to achieve transit
 connectivity, and may extend to work on the state highway system for the construction of passenger rail service through the Altamont Pass Corridor.

(2) Contracting pursuant to paragraph (1) may include the use of the Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery method, pursuant to Chapter 6.7 (commencing with Section 6970) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. 

(3) Contracts authorized pursuant to
 paragraph (1) shall not include the authority to perform construction inspection services for projects on, or interfacing with, the state highway system. The Department of Transportation shall perform construction inspection services for these projects consistent with Section 91.2 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(e) Entering into cooperative or joint development agreements with local governments or private entities necessary to achieve transit connectivity. These agreements may be entered into for purposes of sharing costs, selling or leasing land, air, or development rights, providing for the transferring of passengers, making pooling arrangements, or for any other purpose that is necessary for, incidental to, or convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted to the authority. For purposes of this subdivision, “joint development” includes, but
 is not limited to, an agreement with any person, firm, corporation, association, or organization for the operation of facilities or development of projects adjacent to, or physically or functionally related to, achieving transit connectivity.

(f) Relocation of utilities, as necessary to achieve transit connectivity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   (SB 1068)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

132657.

For an initial 18-month period, the Livermore Amador Valley Transit Authority’s administrative staff shall, if that authority has appointed a member to the board in accordance with Section 132655, provide all necessary administrative support to the board to perform its duties and responsibilities. At the conclusion of the initial period, the board
 may select the Livermore Amador Valley Transit Authority or the San Joaquin Regional Rail Commission to provide administrative support, or may alternatively hire an executive director for those functions. If an executive director is hired, the executive may appoint staff or retain consultants as necessary to carry out the duties of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   (AB 758)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

132658.

(a) The unencumbered balance of all local funds programmed for the completion of the BART Livermore extension or that have otherwise been identified for the connectivity shall be transferred to the authority and be considered resources available to effectuate the authority’s purposes pursuant to this chapter, except that local funds controlled by the Alameda County Transportation Commission to
 be used for completion of the BART Livermore extension or that have otherwise been identified for the connectivity shall continue to be programmed and allocated by the Alameda County Transportation Commission pursuant to measures approved by the voters of Alameda County pursuant to Division 19 (commencing with Section 180000).
